Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) In recognition and honor of the service and sacrifice of  Oregon veterans
who are Native Americans, the Director of Veterans’ Affairs shall provide aid and  assistance
to federally recognized Indian tribes in Oregon with regard to:
(a) Programs of service for Native American veterans overseen by the tribes; and
(b) Accreditation  of tribal veterans representatives by the Office of General Counsel in
the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.
(2) Prior to providing aid and assistance under subsection (1) of this section, the director
shall ensure that employees, agents and representatives of the Department of Veterans’  Af-
Enrolled Senate Bill 80 (SB 80-A) Page 1
fairs who provide aid and assistance to a tribe consult with appropriate  officials and mem-
bers of the tribe as  to the needs of Native American veterans within the tribe, and approach
the provision of aid and assistance to the tribe with an  understanding of cultural values and
practices regarding Native American veterans who are members of the tribe.
Passed by Senate March 28, 2017
Repassed by Senate June 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 1, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 80 (SB 80-A) Page 2